Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-11,158
Teacher education program; include instruction in dyslexia.

On and after July 1, 2019, each teacher education program approved by the State Board of Education shall include as a part of their initial program course requirements instruction in dyslexia, including, but not limited to:

(1) Knowledge and best practice standards for teaching reading;

(2) Characteristics of dyslexia and the science of dyslexia; and

(3) Evidence-based structured literacy interventions, classroom accommodations, and assistive technology for individuals with dyslexia.

Laws 2018, LB1052, § 3.
July 19, 2018